Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.280

Limitation when claimant is minor or incompetent not under guardianship.

The claims of any persons to escheated funds or real property which are not filed within seven years as specified above are forever barred, excepting as to those persons who are minors or who are legally incompetent and not under guardianship, in which event the claim may be filed within seven years after their disability is removed.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.08.280. Prior: 1955 c 254 s 16.]